fst/lexc/git_modifiers.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+PVB
+PNN
+ADV
+MDF
+PL

LEXICON Modifier
+MDF:	#;
+MDF-:^	RootIntransitiveVerb;
+MDF-:^	RootTransitiveVerb;
+MDF-:^	RootNoun;

LEXICON ClauseModifier
+MDF:	#;
+MDF:	SeriesIencl3;

LEXICON Preverb
+PVB:	#;
+PVB-:^	RootIntransitiveVerb;
+PVB-:^	RootTransitiveVerb;

LEXICON Prenoun
+PNN:	#;
+PNN-:^	RootNoun;

LEXICON Adverb
+ADV:	Word;
